Arkansas, session 2025, SB588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 3, Chapter 9, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
3-9-243. Winery private club permit — Scope — Restrictions.
(a) The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue
a winery private club permit that authorizes the winery private club permit
holder to:
(1) Operate a winery private club and manufacture, produce, or
bottle one (1) or more varieties of wine, not to exceed ten thousand (10,000)
cases per year;
(2) Store wine manufactured, produced, or bottled by the winery
private club and other wine that the winery private club permit holder may
lawfully purchase from retailers or other wineries;
(3) Bottle on the premises wine that the winery private club
permittee has lawfully purchased in bulk from an out-of-state winery;
(4) Sell on the premises wine manufactured, produced, bottled,
or lawfully purchased by the winery private club for off-premises consumption
and for on-premises consumption during legal operating hours;
*CRH312*
03/31/2025 1:45:52 PM CRH312

SB588
(5) Serve complimentary samples of wine produced by the winery
private club to a member and guest of a member on the premises of the winery;
(6) Sell wine produced by the winery private club to a wholesale
dealer permitted by this state for the purpose of resale to other retail
permit holders; and
(7) Conduct wine-tasting events for educational or promotional
purposes.
(b) The director may issue a winery private club permit if the winery
private club premises is in a dry area, and the applicant has followed the
permit procedure required by § 3-9-222.
(c) The winery private club permit holder is not required to serve
food on the premises as a condition of holding a winery private club permit.
























03/31/2025 1:45:52 PM CRH312